Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.410

Horses—Registering agencies—Permit required—Fee—Records—Identification symbol inspections—Rules.

(1) No person may act as a registering agency without a permit issued by the director. The director may issue a permit to any person to act as a registering agency for the purpose of issuing permanent identification symbols for horses in a manner prescribed by the director. Application for a permit, or the renewal thereof by January 1 of each year, shall be on a form prescribed by the director, and accompanied by the proof of registration to be issued, any other documents required by the director, and a fee of two hundred and fifty dollars.

(2) Each registering agency shall maintain a permanent record for each individual identification symbol. The record shall include, but need not be limited to, the name, address, and phone number of the horse owner and a general description of the horse. A copy of each permanent record shall be forwarded to the director, if requested by the director.

(3) Horses shall be examined for individual identification symbols when presented for inspection.

(4) The director shall adopt rules necessary to administer this section.

[ 2003 c 326 s 45; 1993 c 354 s 11; 1989 c 286 s 25; 1981 c 296 s 35.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.